Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 15. Taxation and Revenue
§ 16. Disposition of fees, excises and license taxes on vehicles and gasoline.

No moneys derived from fees, excises, or license taxes levied by the state and exclusive of registration fees and licenses or excise taxes imposed by a county or municipality, relating to registration, operation or use of vehicles on public highways, streets or alleys, or to fuels used for propelling such vehicles, shall be expended for other than cost of administering such laws, statutory refunds and adjustments allowed therein, payment of highway obligations, costs for construction, reconstruction, maintenance and repair of public highways, county roads, bridges, and streets, alleys and bridges in cities and towns, and expense of enforcing state traffic laws. (As added by Laws 1953, House Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 280.)

Cross references. —

As to disposition of motor vehicle registration and licensing fees, see §

31-3-103

.

As to disposition of fees under Driver's License Law, see §

31-7-104

.

As to imposition and disposition of taxes on gasoline, see §§

39-17-101

through

39-17-111

.

Section added. —

This section was added by an amendment proposed by Laws 1953, House Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 280, adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 2, 1954, and proclaimed in effect December 7, 1954.

Underground storage tank funding scheme. —

The funding scheme under prior provisions of the taxation and revenue code whereby mineral severance tax revenues previously designated for the state highway fund were used to fund an underground storage tank program and were replaced in the highway fund with proceeds from an additional fuel tax, did not violate the requirement of this section that any vehicle or gasoline tax be committed exclusively to public highway expenses. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

An oil company's bare allegation that the state was funding an underground storage tank program by “fraudulently” transferring fuel tax proceeds required by this section to be used for public highway expenses was insufficient to state a claim for fraud. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Mineral Taxation: The Wyoming Problem as Compared with Other Western States,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1968).

For comment, “State Level Transportation Management,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 701 (1971).

§ 17. County levy for support and maintenance of public schools.

There shall be levied each year in each county of the state a tax of not to exceed six (6) mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of the property in each county for the support and maintenance of the public schools. This tax shall be collected by the county treasurer and disbursed among the school districts within the county as the legislature shall provide. The legislature may authorize boards of trustees of school districts to levy a special tax on the property of the district. The legislature may also provide for the distribution among one (1) or more school districts of any revenue from the special school district property tax in excess of a state average yield, which shall be calculated each year, per average daily membership. (As added by Laws 1965, Senate Joint Resolution No. 10, p. 520; as amended by Laws 1981, House Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 329; Laws 2006, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1.)

2006 amendment. —

Laws 2006, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was approved by a vote of the people at the general election held November 7, 2006 and certified November 15, 2006.

The 2006 amendment relates to the recapture of excess revenues for the support of public schools.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 2, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment to the electors of the state of Wyoming at the next general election for approval or rejection to become valid as a part of the constitution if ratified by a majority of the electors.

The proposed amendment would have eliminated the maximum recapture of excess revenues for the support of public schools. The amendment was not ratified by a majority of electors at the November 2, 2004 general election.

Unified school districts. —

For formation of unified school district joining affluent school district with poorer district, and suggestions for equalization of ad valorem taxation for school purposes, see Sweetwater County Planning Comm. v. Hinkle, 491 P.2d 1234,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1971).

Transitional school funding recapture limits. —

The $250,000 cap imposed on transitional hold harmless payments applicable to wealthy school districts subject to revenue recapture bore a rational relationship to a legitimate state interest in making the transition to a cost-based school funding system and thus did not violate the equal protection provisions of the Wyoming Constitution. Lincoln County Sch. Dist. No. One v. State, 985 P.2d 964,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1999).

Quoted

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Stated

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 18. Full tax credit allowed against any liability arising from a tax on income.

No tax shall be imposed upon income without allowing full credit against such tax liability for all sales, use, and ad valorem taxes paid in the taxable year by the same taxpayer to any taxing authority in Wyoming. (As added by Laws 1973, House Joint Resolution No. 12, p. 752.)

Cross references. —

For provision preempting taxation of income to the state, see §

39-12-101

.

Section added. —

This section was added by an amendment proposed by Laws 1973, House Joint Resolution No. 12, p. 752, adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 5, 1974, and proclaimed in effect December 12, 1974.

§ 19. Mineral excise tax; distribution.

The Legislature shall provide by law for an excise tax on the privilege of severing or extracting minerals, of one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) on the value of the gross product extracted. The minerals subject to such excise tax shall be coal, petroleum, natural gas, oil shale, and such other minerals as may be designated by the Legislature. Such tax shall be in addition to any other excise, severance or ad valorem tax. The proceeds from such tax shall be deposited in the Permanent Wyoming Mineral Trust Fund. The fund, including all monies deposited in the fund from whatever source, shall remain inviolate. The monies in the fund shall be invested as prescribed by the Legislature and all income from fund investments shall be deposited by the State Treasurer in the general fund on an annual basis. The Legislature may also specify by law, conditions and terms under which monies in the fund may be loaned to political subdivisions of the state. (As added by Laws 1974, House Joint Resolution No. 2A, p. 111; Amended by Laws 2006, House Joint Resolution No. 4.)

2006 amendment.

Laws 2006, House Joint Resolution No. 4, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section which was approved by a vote of the people at the general election held November 7, 2006, and certified November 15, 2006.

The 2006 amendment relates to clarifying that all monies deposited in the Permanent Wyoming Mineral Trust Fund are inviolate permanent funds of the state.

Section added. —

This section was added by an amendment proposed by Laws 1974, House Joint Resolution No. 2A, p. 111, adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 5, 1974, and proclaimed in effect December 12, 1974.

Green River/Rock Springs water treatment plant. —

Laws 1995, ch. 201, §§ 1 through 7, authorize the design, construction, and operation of the Green River/Rock Springs water treatment plant, describe the project, restrict the sale of water and sale of the project, and provide for a loan from the Wyoming mineral trust fund under specified options.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions concerning tax, see chapter 14 of title 39.

Department of revenue and taxation was not required to continue invalid pricing system

used in 1985 for determining the severance tax on uranium, where the system afforded no reasonable relationship to market value and was illegal and contrary to the constitutional mandates of equal and uniform taxation. Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

Exhaustion of administrative remedies. —

Taxpayer was required to exhaust administrative remedies before bringing declaratory judgment action; constitutionally-established and statutorily-directed agency was proper forum for initial review of challenge to tax assessment. Union Pac. Resources Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 356,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 20. Higher education trust funds; investments; earnings.

The legislature may from time to time place monies into endowment funds for higher education scholarships and for improving the quality of higher education, which funds shall remain inviolate. The earnings of the funds shall be used for the purposes specified in this section, but the legislature may from time to time by law regulate the manner in which the earnings are expended. The legislature may also provide for use of the earnings to protect the funds from inflation and to even fluctuations in earnings over time. The funds may be invested in the same manner as other permanent funds of the state. (As added by Laws 2006, House Joint Resolution No. 4, Section 1.)

Section added. —

This section was added by an amendment proposed by Laws 2006, House Joint Resolution No. 4, Section 1, adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 7, 2006, and certified on November 15, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, House Joint Resolution No. 4, Section 3 states as follows:

“It is the intention of the legislature that if approved by the voters this amendment will immediately apply to the funds within the education endowment account and the Hathaway student scholarship account previously established by law in Wyoming statutes 21-16-1201(a) and (b), and would subsequently apply to other higher education endowment funds as designated by law.”

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, §§ 1 to 4, requests Congress to propose and submit to the several states for ratification an amendment to the United States Constitution prohibiting the Supreme Court and inferior federal courts from having the power to instruct or order a state or political subdivision, or an official of such, to levy or increase taxes.